District of Columbia statutes.
50-2206.58

Fines.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all fines imposed and collected pursuant to this subchapter during fiscal year 2006 and each succeeding fiscal year shall be transferred to the General Fund of the District of Columbia.

History

Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-145, § 3w
as added Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 103(e)(3), 59 DCR 12957

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-266 added this section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 103(e)(3) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 103(e)(3) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).